Massachusetts, session 194th, S211.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 185A of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in section 249 of chapter
238 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (a) and inserting in place
thereof the following subsection:
(a) No person shall engage in the business of reselling tickets to any theatrical exhibition,
public show or public amusement or exhibition required to be licensed under sections 181 and
182 or under chapter 128A, or facilitating a mechanism for 2 or more parties to participate in the
resale of any ticket of admission thereto, whether such business is conducted on or off the
premises on which such ticket or other evidence is to be used, without being licensed by the
commissioner of occupational licensure.
of 1